Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 12. Motor Vehicle Carriers Generally.

§§ 56-273 through 56-338.

Repealed by Acts 1995, cc. 744 and 803.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 56-273, 56-291.9 through 56-291.13, and 56-304 through 56-304.11, were repealed effective January 1, 1996, by Acts 1995, cc. 744 and 803.

Section 56-285 was previously repealed by Acts 1960, c. 532.

Sections 56-291.4 through 56-291.8:1 were previously repealed by Acts 1989, c. 467.

Section 56-296.1 was previously repealed by Acts 1972, c. 418.

Section 56-304.14 was previously repealed by Acts 1986, c. 15.

Sections 56-308, 56-317, 56-318, and 56-319 were amended by Acts 1995, c. 124. At the direction of the Code Commission, these amendments were implemented in comparable sections enacted by Acts 1995, cc. 744 and 803, former §§ 46.2-2033, 46.2-2036, 46.2-2037,
and 46.2-2038, respectively, which were subsequently repealed by Acts 2001, c. 596.

Sections 56-326 through 56-328 were previously repealed by Acts 1970, c. 729. Section 56-336 was previously repealed by Acts 1970, c. 463.